Mississippi, session 2026, SB2681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following shall be codified as Section 43-13-115.2, Mississippi Code of 1972: 43-13-115.2. (1)  The Office of the Governor, Division of Medicaid, shall enter into negotiations with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) to obtain a waiver of applicable provisions of the Medicaid laws and regulations under Section 1115 of the Social Security Act to provide Medicaid benefits to children eighteen (18) years of age or less with specific diagnosis, including complex medical conditions, severe developmental disabilities, significant communication impairments, or other conditions prescribed by the State Department of Health during a presumptive eligibility period.  During the presumptive eligibility period, the Medicaid benefits available for those children will be limited to mental health services or substance use disorder services, as applicable.  The presumptive eligibility shall allow immediate access to services while formal documentation is pending, subject to verification. (2)  Presumptive eligibility period.  The presumptive eligibility period for those children will be the period that (a) begins with the date on which a qualified entity determines, on the basis of preliminary information, that the child is otherwise eligible for Medicaid benefits, and (b) ends with and includes the earlier of (i) the day on which a determination is made with respect to the eligibility of the child for Medicaid benefits, or (ii) in the case of such a child who does not file an application by the last day of the month following the month during which the entity makes the determination that the child is otherwise eligible for Medicaid benefits, such last day. (3)  Qualified entities. The determination of presumptive eligibility for those children will be made qualified entities approved by the division that are Medicaid providers and determined by the division to be capable of making Medicaid eligibility determinations for those types of children. (4)  Notification requirements.  A qualified entity that determines that a child is presumptively eligible for Medicaid benefits shall (a) notify the division of the determination within five (5) working days after the date on which determination is made, and (b) inform the child at the time the determination is made that an application for Medicaid benefits is required to be made by not later than the last day of the month following the month during which the determination is made. (5)  Requirement to apply Medicaid benefits.  In the case of a child who is determined by a qualified entity to be presumptively eligible for Medicaid benefits, the child must apply for Medicaid benefits by not later than the last day of the month following the month during which the determination is made. (6)  The division shall submit the application for the waiver described in this section not later than October 1, 2026. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.